Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1919
Disclosure of information by employee; personnel actions prohibited.

Any person who has authority to recommend, approve, direct, or otherwise take or affect personnel action shall not, with respect to such authority:

(1) Take personnel action against an employee because of the disclosure of information by the employee to the office which the employee reasonably believes evidences wrongdoing under the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act;

(2) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for the submission of an allegation of wrongdoing under the act to the office by such employee; or

(3) Take personnel action against an employee as a reprisal for providing information or testimony pursuant to actions initiated and undertaken by the office.

Laws 2017, LB539, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-920;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 63.